Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2195.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) There is hereby established in the state treasury the
Kansas technical college operating grant fund, which shall be
administered by the state board of regents. All expenditures from the
Kansas technical college operating grant fund shall be for instruction
and operations to meet target objectives established by the
postsecondary technical education authority for each technical college's
region and the entire state. All expenditures from the Kansas technical
college operating grant fund shall be made in accordance with
appropriation acts upon warrants of the director of accounts and reports
issued pursuant to vouchers approved by the executive officer of the
state board of regents or the executive officer's designee.
(b) As used in this section, "technical college" means the same as
defined in K.S.A. 71-1802, and amendments thereto, and the Washburn
institute of technology.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the Kansas register.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the House, and passed
that body
HOUSE concurred in
SENATE amendments
__________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House.
Chief Clerk of the House.
Passed the SENATE
as amended
President of the Senate.
Secretary of the Senate.
APPROVED
______________________________________________________________________________
Governor.